Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Kentucky Model Procurement Code
45A.100.
Small purchases by state governmental bodies.

Procurements may be made in accordance with small purchase administrative regulations promulgated by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, as follows:

Up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per project for construction and one thousand dollars ($1,000) for purchases by any state governmental body, except for those state administrative bodies specified in paragraph (b) of this subsection; and

Up to forty thousand dollars ($40,000) per project for construction or purchases by the Finance and Administration Cabinet, state institutions of higher education, and the legislative branch of government.

Procurement requirements shall not be artificially divided so as to constitute a small purchase under this section. Reverse auctions may be used for small purchase procurements. At least every two (2) years, the secretary shall review the prevailing costs of labor and materials and may make recommendations to the next regular session of the General Assembly for the revision of the then current maximum small purchase amount as justified by intervening changes in the cost of labor and materials.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet may grant to any state agency with a justifiable need a delegation of small purchasing authority which exceeds the agency’s small purchase limit provided in subsection (1) of this section. Delegations of small purchasing authority shall be granted or revoked by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A. These administrative regulations shall establish, at a minimum, the criteria for granting and revoking delegations of small purchasing authority, including the requesting agency’s past compliance with purchasing regulations, the level of training of the agency’s purchasing staff, and the extent to which the agency utilizes the Kentucky Automated Purchasing System. The administrative regulations may permit the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet to delegate small purchase procurements up to the maximum amount specified in subsection (1)(b) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 21, effective January 1, 1979; 1980, ch. 242, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 250, § 19, effective April 9, 1980; 1982, ch. 282, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 384, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 384, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 496, § 5, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 323, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 60, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 225, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 320, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2010, ch. 63, § 5, effective July 15, 2010.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The emergency clause of Acts 1982, ch. 282 related solely to § 3 of the act which amended KRS

45A.335

to exclude members of state boards and commissions from the term “officer or employe,” as used in the conflict of interest statute, KRS 45A.340(5); it not only did not relate to the other sections of the bill, which were separable, but it gave no reason to justify that an emergency existed with respect to these sections. In view of the fact that Ky. Const., § 55 requires an act to express in plain language what the emergency is in order for it to be effective, only § 3 became effective on April 2, 1982, upon the passage of the act and approval of the Governor, and the remaining sections of the act became effective as ordinary legislation on July 15, 1982.

OAG 82-308

.

45A.105.
Cancellation of invitations for bids or requests for proposals.

An invitation for bids, a request for proposals, or other solicitation may be canceled, or all bids or proposals may be rejected, if it is determined in writing that such action is taken in the best interest of the Commonwealth and approved by the purchasing officer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 22, effective January 1, 1979.

45A.110.
Responsibility of bidders and offerors — Determination — Right of nondisclosure.

A written determination of responsibility of a bidder or offeror shall be made and it shall be made in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet. A reasonable inquiry to determine the responsibility of a bidder or offeror may be conducted. The failure of a bidder or offeror to promptly supply information in connection with such an inquiry may be grounds for a determination of nonresponsibility with respect to such a bidder or offeror.

A written determination of responsibility of a bidder or offeror shall not be made until the bidder or offeror provides the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet with his sworn statement made under penalty of perjury that he has not knowingly violated any provision of the campaign finance laws of the Commonwealth and that the award of a contract to a bidder or offeror will not violate any provision of the campaign finance laws of the Commonwealth. “Knowingly” means, with respect to conduct or to a circumstance described by a statute defining an offense, that a person is aware or should have been aware that his conduct is of that nature or that the circumstance exists.

Except as otherwise provided by law, information furnished by a bidder or offeror pursuant to this section may not be disclosed outside of the Division of State Purchasing or the purchasing agency administering the contract without prior written consent of the bidder or offeror.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 23, effective January 1, 1979; 1992, ch. 288, § 17, effective July 14, 1992.

45A.115.
Prequalification of suppliers.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet may provide for prequalification of suppliers as responsible prospective contractors for particular types of supplies, services, and construction. The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall not prequalify a supplier as a responsible prospective contractor until the supplier provides the secretary with his sworn statement made under penalty of perjury that he has not knowingly violated any provision of the campaign finance laws of the Commonwealth and that the award of a contract to the supplier will not violate any provision of the campaign finance laws of the Commonwealth. “Knowingly” means, with respect to conduct or to a circumstance described by a statute defining an offense, that a person is aware or should have been aware that his conduct is of that nature or that the circumstance exists. Solicitation lists of potential contractors of such supplies, services, and construction shall include but shall not be limited to such prequalified suppliers. Prequalification shall not foreclose a written determination:

Between the time of the bid opening or receipt of offers and the making of an award, that a prequalified supplier is not responsible; or

That a supplier who is not prequalified at the time of bid opening or receipt of offers is responsible.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 24, effective January 1, 1979; 1992, ch. 288, § 18, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 120, § 11, effective July 15, 1998.

45A.120.
Cost or pricing data — Price adjustment.

A contractor shall submit cost or pricing data and shall certify that, to the best of his knowledge and belief, the cost or pricing data submitted was accurate, complete, and current as of a mutually determined specified date prior to the date of:

The pricing of any negotiated contract where the total contract price is expected to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000); or

The pricing of any change order or contract modification which is expected to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or such lesser amount in either instance as may be prescribed by the purchasing officer.

Any contract, change, or modification thereto under which a certificate is required shall contain a provision that the price to the Commonwealth, including profit or fee, shall be adjusted to exclude any significant sums by which the purchasing officer finds that such price was increased because the contractor furnished cost or pricing data, as of the date agreed upon between the parties, which was inaccurate, incomplete, or not current.

The requirements of this section need not be applied to contracts where the price negotiated is based on adequate price competition, established catalogue or market prices of commercial items sold in substantial quantities to the general public, prices set by law or regulation, or in exceptional cases where it is determined in writing by the chief purchasing officer that the requirements of this section may be waived, and the reasons for such waiver are stated in writing.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 25, effective January 1, 1979.

45A.125.
Cost plus contract prohibited.

The cost plus a percentage of cost system of contracting shall not be used.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 26, effective January 1, 1979.

45A.130.
Cost reimbursement contracts.

No contract providing for the reimbursement of the contractor’s cost plus a fixed fee, hereinafter referred to as a cost reimbursement contract, may be made under KRS

45A.085

,

45A.090

or

45A.095

, unless it is determined in writing by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet that such contract is likely to be less costly to the Commonwealth than any other type of contract, or that it is impracticable to obtain supplies or services of the kind or quality required except under such a contract.

Each contractor under a cost reimbursement type contract shall give notice, as provided for in the contract, before entering into:

A cost reimbursement type subcontract; or

Any other type of subcontract involving more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or ten percent (10%) of the estimated cost of the prime contract.

All cost reimbursement type contracts shall contain a provision that only costs recognized as allowable, in accordance with cost principles set forth in regulations issued pursuant to KRS

45A.215

, will be reimbursable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 27, effective January 1, 1979.

45A.135.
Types of contracts.

Subject to the limitations of KRS

45A.125

and

45A.130

, any type of contract which will promote the best interests of the Commonwealth may be used.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 28, effective January 1, 1979.

45A.140.
Accounting system.

Except with respect to firm fixed price type contracts, no contract type shall be used unless it has been determined in writing that the proposed contractor’s accounting system will permit timely development of all necessary cost data in the form required by the specific contract type contemplated and that the contractor’s accounting system is adequate to allocate costs in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 29, effective January 1, 1979.

45A.145.
Multiyear contracts.

Unless otherwise provided in the statute making appropriations therefor, multiyear contracts for supplies and services may be entered into for periods not extending beyond the end of the biennium in which the contract was made, if funds for the first fiscal year of the contemplated contract are available at the time of contracting. Payment and performance obligations for succeeding fiscal years shall be subject to the availability of funds therefor.

Prior to the utilization of a contract as described in subsection (1) of this section, it shall be determined in writing by the chief purchasing officer:

That estimated requirements cover the period of the contract and are reasonably firm and continuing; and

That such contract will serve the best interests of the Commonwealth by encouraging effective competition or otherwise promoting economies in state procurement.

When funds are not appropriated or otherwise made available to support continuation of performance in a subsequent year of a contract as described in subsection (1) of this section, the contract for such subsequent year may be canceled and the contractor shall be reimbursed for the reasonable value of any nonrecurring costs incurred but not amortized in the price of the supplies or services delivered under the contract. The cost of cancellation may be paid from:

Appropriations currently available for performance of the contract; or

Appropriations currently available for procurement of similar supplies or services and not otherwise obligated; or

Appropriations made specifically for the payment of such cancellation costs.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 30, effective January 1, 1979.

45A.150.
Right to inspect — Right to audit.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet may inspect the plant or place of business of a contractor or any subcontractor under any contract awarded or to be awarded by the Commonwealth.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet may audit the books and records of any person who has submitted cost or pricing data under KRS

45A.120

at any time until the period of record retention as set forth in subsection (3) of this section shall have expired. The right to audit hereunder shall only extend to those books and records reasonably connected with cost or pricing data submitted under KRS

45A.120

, and such books and records shall be maintained by the contractor or subcontractor for the period specified in subsection (3) of this section.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall be entitled to audit the books and records of a contractor or any subcontractor under any negotiated contract or subcontract other than a firm fixed-price type contract, provided, however, that this subsection shall not limit the right to audit as set forth in subsection (2) of this section. Such books and records shall be maintained by the contractor for a period of three (3) years from the date of final payment under the prime contract and by the subcontractor for a period of three (3) years from the date of final payment under the subcontract.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 31, effective January 1, 1979.

45A.155.
Finality of determinations.

The determinations required by KRS 45A.085(1), (3), (6), and (7). 45A.090(1), (2) and (3);

45A.095

;

45A.105

; 45A.110(1); 45A.120(3); and 45A.130(1) shall be final and conclusive unless they are clearly erroneous, arbitrary, capricious, or contrary to law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 32, effective January 1, 1979; 2003, ch. 98, § 22, effective June 24, 2003.

45A.160.
Reporting of suspected collusion — Documents.

When for any reason collusion is suspected among any bidders or offerors, a written notice of the facts giving rise to such suspicion shall be transmitted to the Attorney General.

All documents involved in any procurement in which collusion is suspected shall be retained until the Attorney General gives notice that they may be released, and all such documents shall be made available to the Attorney General or his designee upon request.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 33, effective January 1, 1979.

45A.165.
Report of contracts made under KRS 45A.095.

A report shall be compiled annually by the chief purchasing officer, within ninety (90) days following the close of the fiscal year, of contracts made under KRS

45A.095

during that preceding fiscal year. The report shall:

Name each contractor;

State the amount and type of each contract;

Describe the supplies, services, or construction purchased by each contract; and

Include as attachments copies of all determinations and findings required to be made by provisions of this code and implementing regulations.

Reports required under subsection (1) of this section shall be retained for a period of five (5) years and shall be made available to the General Assembly and the public upon request.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 34, effective January 1, 1979.

45A.170.
Specifications
— Items considered equal may be furnished.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall have responsibility for issuing and maintaining all standard specifications for supplies, services, and construction required by the Commonwealth. Among its duties, it shall, to the greatest extent practicable:

Prepare and issue standard specifications for supplies, services, and construction commonly required by the Commonwealth;

Revise all standard specifications to conform to all technical and scientific advances pertaining to the supplies, services, and construction described in those specifications and to reflect changes in the Commonwealth’s requirements;

Establish guidelines for drafting specifications; and

Ensure that every invitation for bids or request for proposals shall provide that an item equal to that named or described in the specifications may be furnished. The specifications may identify a sole brand in cases where, in the written opinion of the chief procurement officer, documented unique and valid conditions require compatibility, continuity, or conformity with established standards. An item shall be considered equal to the item named or described if, in the opinion of the owner and the design professional responsible for the specifications:

It is at least equal in quality, durability, strength, design, and other criteria deemed appropriate;

It will perform at least equally the function imposed by the general design for the public work being contracted for or the material being purchased; and

It conforms substantially to the detailed requirements for the item in the specifications.

All specifications shall be drafted so as to maximize, to the extent practicable, competition in fulfillment of the Commonwealth’s requirements.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 35, effective January 1, 1979; 2008, ch. 47, § 2, effective July 15, 2008.

45A.175.
Definitions of terms used in KRS 45A.170 to 45A.205. [Repealed.]

45A.180.
Selection of method of construction contracting management.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations by October 15, 2003, providing for as many alternative methods of management of construction contracting as he or she may determine to be feasible; setting forth criteria to be used in determining which method of management of construction is to be used for a particular project; establishing a model process parallel to the selection committee procedures established in

45A.810

for the procurement of alternative project services of “construction management-at-risk” and “design-build,” and for a “construction manager-general contractor” and a “construction manager-agency;” and providing that the chief purchasing officer shall execute and include in the contract file a written statement setting forth the facts recommending that a particular method of management of construction contracting be used. The administrative regulations shall include the establishment of:

The relative weighing between qualifications and price, including the reciprocal preference for resident bidders required under KRS

45A.494

; and

The level of stipend, if any, available for the various types of projects.

When a request for proposal for a project utilizing an alternative project delivery method is issued, the contracting body shall transmit a copy of the request for proposal to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee staff.

Upon issuance of the contract for a project utilizing an alternative project delivery method, the contracting body shall submit the contract to the Government Contract Review Committee for review in accordance with KRS

45A.690

to

45A.725

. The contracting body shall insure the contract clearly identifies to the committee that an alternative project delivery method is being utilized. Upon disapproval of or objection to the contract by the committee, the contracting body shall determine whether the contract shall be revised to comply with the objections of the committee, be canceled, or remain in effect. Subsequent contract amendments relating to change orders shall not be required to be submitted to the Government Contract Review Committee.

A request for proposal for a project utilizing an alternative project delivery method under this section shall specifically state the evaluation factors and the relative weight of each to be used in the scoring of awards.

Any governing body of a postsecondary institution that manages its capital construction program under KRS

164A.580

shall adhere to the regulations promulgated under this section when utilizing an alternative project delivery method for capital projects, and shall report to legislative committees as specified in this section.

Any corporation as described by KRS 45.750(2)(c) or as created under the Kentucky Revised Statutes as a governmental agency and instrumentality of the Commonwealth that manages its capital construction program shall adhere to the regulations promulgated under this section when utilizing an alternative project delivery method for capital projects, and shall report to legislative committees as specified in this section.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 36, effective January 1, 1979; 2003, ch. 98, § 7, effective June 24, 2003; 2010, ch. 162, § 10, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 105, § 10, effective June 24, 2015.

45A.181.
Requirements for request for proposal when capital project is to be constructed utilizing the design-build construction method.

When a capital project is to be constructed utilizing the design-build construction method in accordance with KRS

45A.180

, the percentage of scoring to be attributed to the guaranteed maximum price shall be stated in the request for proposal. A request for proposal may allow for the payment of stipends for the technical proposal phase provided that the amount of the stipends and the terms under which stipends are to be paid are stated in the request for proposal.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 98, § 8, effective June 24, 2003.

45A.182.
Selection committee procedures to apply when capital project is to be constructed utilizing the design-build method — Cancellation or rejection of requests or proposals.

When a capital project is to be constructed utilizing the design-build method in accordance with KRS

45A.180

, a process parallel to the selection committee procedures established in KRS

45A.810

shall apply when procuring a design-build team and shall incorporate the following:

The evaluation process may include a multiple phased proposal that is based on qualifications, experience, technical requirements, guaranteed maximum price, and other criteria as set forth in the request for proposal. The guaranteed maximum price component shall be submitted by the offeror independently of other documents and shall be held by the executive director of the Office of Facility Development and Efficiency.

Each evaluator shall independently score each phase and indicate a total score for all evaluation factors as set forth in the request for proposal.

Final phase proposals from the offerors on the short list shall be evaluated and scored by the evaluation committee members who shall not have knowledge of the guaranteed maximum price component. Each evaluator shall independently score the final phase proposals and indicate a total score. A total average score shall be calculated for each offeror. Then each offeror’s respective score for the guaranteed maximum price and any reciprocal preference for resident bidders required under KRS

45A.494

shall be added. The offeror with the highest point total in the final phase shall receive the contract award unless the guaranteed maximum price proposal is in excess of the authorized budget. If two (2) or more of the offerors achieve the same highest point total at the end of the final phase scoring, the purchasing officer shall request best-and-final proposals from each offeror.

If the guaranteed maximum price of the offeror with the highest point total in the final phase is greater than the amount of funds identified in the request for proposal, then competitive negotiations may be conducted with the offerors under the following restrictions:

If discussion pertaining to the revision of the specifications or quantities are held, the offerors shall be afforded an opportunity to take part in such discussions.

Written revisions of the specifications shall be made available to each of the offerors and shall provide for an expeditious response.

Information derived from revised maximum guaranteed price proposals shall not be disclosed to competing offerors.

A request for proposal or other solicitation may be canceled, or all proposals may be rejected, if it is determined in writing that such action is taken in the best interest of the Commonwealth and approved by the purchasing officer.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 98, § 10, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 85, § 73, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 12, § 28, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 162, § 11, effective July 15, 2010.

45A.183.
Selection committee procedures to apply when capital project is to be constructed using the construction management-at-risk method — Competitive process consistent with code to apply when construction project is to be constructed using the construction manager-general contractor method — Administrative regulations.

When a capital project is to be constructed using the construction management-at-risk method, a process parallel to the selection committee procedures established in KRS

45A.810

shall apply when procuring a construction management-at-risk firm and regulations promulgated in accordance with KRS

45A.180

shall apply that set forth requirements for:

Description of the bond, insurance, and other security provisions that apply to a project;

Description of appropriate contract clauses and fiscal responsibility requirements that apply to each project; and

Restrictions relating to conflicts of interest, including a provision that a construction management-at-risk entity shall be eligible to become an offeror of goods or services on a project it manages only when a subcontractor fails to perform and upon prior approval by the contracting body.

When a construction project is to be constructed using the construction manager-general contractor method, a competitive process consistent with this code established by administrative regulations promulgated under KRS

45A.180

shall apply.

The procurement process shall set forth the requirements for:

Description of the bond, insurance, and other security provisions that apply to the project;

Description of appropriate contract clauses and fiscal responsibility requirements that apply to the project; and

Restrictions relating to conflicts of interest, including a provision that a construction manager-general contractor shall be eligible to become an offeror of goods or services on a project it manages only when a subcontractor fails to perform and upon prior approval by the contracting body.

The selection of the construction manager-general contractor shall be based on:

Qualifications; and

Price, including preconstruction consulting services, overhead, and profit.

Prior to the construction phase, the construction manager-general contractor shall competitively bid the subcontracts by public notice and award each subcontract to the lowest responsive and responsible bidder.

The final construction cost and completion date for the project shall be established by change order after the construction manager-general contractor enters into all applicable subcontracts.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 98, § 11, effective June 24, 2003; 2015 ch. 105, § 11, effective June 24, 2015.

45A.184.
Selection committee procedures to apply when procuring services of construction manager-agency for a fee.

The selection committee procedures established in KRS

45A.180

shall apply when procuring services of a construction manager-agency for a fee if the fee amount exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 98, § 12, effective June 24, 2003.

45A.185.
Bid bonds.

Bidder security shall be required for all competitive sealed bidding for construction contracts when the price is estimated by the Commonwealth to exceed forty thousand dollars ($40,000). Bidder’s security shall be a bond provided by a surety company authorized to do business in this Commonwealth, or the equivalent in cash, in a form satisfactory to the Commonwealth. Nothing herein prevents the requirement of such bonds on construction contracts under forty thousand dollars ($40,000) when the circumstances warrant.

Bidder’s security shall be in an amount equal to at least five percent (5%) of the amount of the bid.

When the invitation for bids requires that bidder security be provided, noncompliance requires that the bid be rejected, provided, however, that the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet may set forth by regulation exceptions to this requirement in the event of substantial compliance.

After the bids are opened, they shall be irrevocable for the period specified in the invitation for bids, provided that, if a bidder is permitted to withdraw his bid before award because of a mistake in the bid as allowed by law or regulation, no action shall be had against the bidder or the bidder’s security.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 37, effective January 1, 1979; 2005, ch. 85, § 70, effective June 20, 2005.

45A.187.
Limitations on use of reverse auction process.

The reverse auction process shall not be used to procure architectural, engineering, or engineering-related services as described in KRS

45A.730

; underwriter, bond counsel, or financial advisors as described in KRS

45A.850

; or contracts for construction as described in KRS

45A.030

which are required to be bonded as described in KRS

45A.185

and

45A.190

or those projects which would require the preparation of stamped drawings.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 85, § 71, effective June 20, 2005.

45A.190.
Performance bond and payment bond — Recommendations on whether performance bond should be required — Audit of contract performance — Release from performance bond.

As used in this section, “agency contract administrator” means the state agency employee responsible for the administration of a contract.

When a construction contract is awarded in an amount in excess of forty thousand dollars ($40,000), the following bonds shall be furnished to the Commonwealth, and shall be binding on the parties upon the award of the contract:

A performance bond satisfactory to the Commonwealth executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this Commonwealth, or otherwise supplied, satisfactory to the Commonwealth, in an amount equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the contract price as it may be increased; and

A payment bond satisfactory to the Commonwealth executed by a surety company authorized to do business in the Commonwealth, or otherwise supplied, satisfactory to the Commonwealth, for the protection of all persons supplying labor and material to the contractor or his subcontractors, for the performance of the work provided for in the contract. The bond shall be in an amount equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the original contract price.

When any contract in an amount in excess of forty thousand dollars ($40,000) for commodities, supplies, equipment, or services of any kind, or when a contract for construction services costing forty thousand dollars ($40,000) or less is proposed for presentation to vendors or contractors, the agency contract administrator shall evaluate whether a performance bond should be required in the procurement document, and make his recommendation to the purchasing agency. The agency contract administrator shall note the reason that a performance bond is or is not recommended and his notation shall be a part of the permanent record relating to the contract. If a performance bond is required, the requirement shall be included in the invitation to bid, request for proposal, or other procurement document. The agency contract administrator shall make audits of the performance of contracts upon completion of one-third (1/3) of the contract and upon completion of two-thirds (2/3) of the contract. For contracts taking longer than one (1) year to complete, audits of performance shall be conducted at least annually. Before a vendor is released from a performance bond, the agency contract administrator shall review the audits of performance, make a final performance review, and promptly determine whether, in his or her opinion, the vendor has fully complied with the terms of the contract. The opinion of the agency contract administrator shall be made in writing or electronically, set forth the reasons for his or her opinion regarding compliance or noncompliance, and be signed by the agency contract administrator. This opinion may have an electronic signature. The using agency head shall, after consideration of the performance audits, the final performance review, and the opinion of the agency contract administrator regarding compliance or noncompliance, determine whether to recommend to the purchasing agency that the performance bond be released or whether a claim should be made against the performance bond. This determination of the using agency head shall be in writing, signed by the using agency head, and forwarded to the purchasing agency. This determination may have an electronic signature and be transmitted electronically. If the recommendation of the using agency is not followed by the purchasing agency, the purchasing agency shall place a statement in the file explaining why it is not followed.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of the Commonwealth to require a performance bond or other security in addition to those bonds, or in circumstances other than specified in subsection (2) or (3) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 38, effective January 1, 1979; 1998, ch. 324, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 85, § 72, effective June 20, 2005.

45A.195.
Bond forms.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall promulgate by regulation the form of the bonds required by KRS

45A.180

to

45A.200

.

The purchasing agency shall furnish a certified copy of a bond to any person who requests a copy and pays a reasonable fee for the copy. The copy shall be prima facie evidence of the contents, execution, and delivery of the original.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 39, effective January 1, 1979; 1992, ch. 55, § 9, effective July 14, 1992.

45A.200.
Contract adjustment clauses — Termination clause.

For all construction contracts expected to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in price, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall specify clauses providing for adjustments to contract terms and conditions where there has been:

A unilaterally ordered change by the Commonwealth; or

A site condition differing from that indicated in the contract except for turnkey contracts or negotiated contracts when appropriate written findings of fact have been made; or

Variation in the estimated quantities in a contract providing for estimated quantities; or

A unilateral suspension of work by the Commonwealth.

In addition, there shall also be specified for inclusion in all construction contracts expected to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in price a clause providing that a contract may be terminated for the convenience of the Commonwealth or for default, and further providing for liquidated damages when appropriate and as specified in the contract schedule, with excuses for nonperformance specifically provided for therein.

The above specified clauses and conditions required for inclusion in all construction contracts expected to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in price shall be available for optional use in other construction contracts.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 40, effective January 1, 1979.

45A.205.
Policy as to architectural and engineering services. [Repealed.]

45A.210.
Issuance of regulations concerning modification and termination of contracts by Commonwealth.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet is authorized to issue regulations permitting or requiring the insertion, in contracts for the procurement of supplies or services, of appropriate clauses to enable the Commonwealth to effect desired changes and modifications to such contracts.

The secretary is authorized to issue regulations relating to the termination of contracts for the procurement of supplies or services for the default of the contractor.

The secretary is authorized to issue regulations relating to the termination of contracts for the procurement of supplies or services for the convenience of the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 42, effective January 1, 1979.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Any modifications or amendments to a competitively bid contract must be made by the Executive Branch pursuant to KRS Chapter 45A, unless such requirements are superseded by suspension of the procurement statutes by the General Assembly or declaration of a state of emergency by the Governor. Termination of a contract for convenience has as its central purpose the avoidance of payment of future anticipated profits by the Commonwealth. Termination of a contract for cause may be appropriate where a contract fails to meet the minimum standards imposed by statute.

OAG 2004-09

.

45A.215.
Cost principles regulations required.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall issue regulations setting forth cost principles which shall be used:

As guidelines in the negotiation of:

Estimated costs or fixed prices when the absence of open market competition precludes the use of competitive sealed bidding;

Adjustments for state-directed changes or modifications in contract performance; and

Settlements of contracts which have been terminated.

To determine the allowability of incurred costs for the purpose of reimbursing costs under contract provisions which provide for the reimbursement of costs; and

As appropriate in any other situation where the determination of the estimated or the incurred costs of performing contracts may be required.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 43, effective January 1, 1979.